Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1914.02
Unlicensed child care; restraining order or injunction; department; powers.

The department may apply for a restraining order or a temporary or permanent injunction against any person violating the Child Care Licensing Act by providing unlicensed child care when a license is required. The district court of the county where the violation is occurring shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

Laws 1997, LB 310, § 9;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 76.